Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.807

Task force—Review of federal 2007 race and ethnicity reporting guidelines—Development of state guidelines.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall convene a task force to review the United States department of education 2007 race and ethnicity reporting guidelines and develop race and ethnicity guidance for the state. The task force must include representatives from the educational opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee, the ethnic commissions, the governor's office of Indian affairs, and a diverse group of parents. The guidance must clarify for students and families why information about race and ethnicity is collected and how students and families can help school administrators properly identify them. The guidance must also describe the best practices for school administrators to use when identifying the race and ethnicity of students and families. The task force must use the United States census and the American community survey in the development of the guidance.

[2016 c 72 s 502.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2016 c 72: See note following RCW 28A.600.015.